North Carolina statutes. Chapter 53. Regulation of Financial Services.
Article 19B. The Secure and Fair Enforcement Mortgage Licensing Act.
§ 53-244.120.
Confidentiality of information.

Notwithstanding any State law to the contrary, the Commissioner shall report enforcement actions under this Article and may report other relevant information to the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry.

The Commissioner is authorized to enter agreements or sharing arrangements with other governmental agencies, the Conference of State Bank Supervisors, the American Association of Residential Mortgage Regulators, or other associations representing governmental agencies and may share otherwise confidential information pursuant to these written agreements.

The requirements of

G.S. 53C-2-7

regarding the privacy or confidentiality of any information or material provided under subsections (a) and (b) of this section, and any privilege arising under any other federal or State law with respect to such information or material, shall continue to apply to the information or material after it has been disclosed to an entity described in subsection (a) or (b) of this section. Information or material held by such an entity shall not be subject to disclosure under any State law governing the disclosure to the public of information held by an officer or agency of the State. The entities described in subsections (a) and (b) of this section may share information and material with all State and federal regulatory officials with mortgage industry oversight authority without the loss of privilege or the loss of confidentiality protections provided by State or federal law.

Any provision of Chapter 132 of the General Statutes relating to the disclosure of confidential supervisory information or of any information or material described in subsection (a) of this section that is inconsistent with this section shall be superseded by the requirements of this section.

The confidentiality provisions contained in subsection (c) of this section shall not apply with respect to the information or material relating to the employment history of and publicly adjudicated disciplinary and enforcement actions against mortgage lenders, mortgage brokers, mortgage servicers, mortgage loan originators, transitional mortgage loan originators, or registrants that are included in the Nationwide Mortgage Licensing System and Registry for access by the public.

History.

2009-374, s. 2; 2012-56, s. 24; 2013-327, s. 16; 2015-293, s. 1.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-56, s. 24, effective October 1, 2012, substituted “G.S. 53C-2-7” for “G.S. 53-99(b)” in subsection (c).

Session Laws 2013-327, s. 16, effective September 1, 2013, in subsection (e), added “or transitional mortgage loan originators” and made a minor stylistic change. For applicability, see editor’s note.

Session Laws 2015-293, s. 1, effective November 1, 2015, substituted “transitional mortgage loan originators, or registrants” for “or transitional mortgage loan originators” near the end of subsection (e). For applicability, see editor’s note.

§ 53-244.121.
Review by Banking Commission.

The Banking Commission may review any rule, regulation, order, or act of the Commissioner made pursuant to or with respect to the provisions of this Article, and any person aggrieved by any rule, regulation, order, or act may, pursuant to

G.S. 53C-2-6

, appeal to the Banking Commission for review upon giving 20 days’ written notice after the rule, regulation, order, or act is adopted or issued. The notice of appeal shall specifically state the grounds for appeal and, in the case of an appeal from a contested case proceeding before the Commissioner, shall set forth in numbered order the assignments of error for review by the Banking Commission. Failure to specify the assignments of error shall constitute grounds to dismiss the appeal. Failure to comply with the briefing schedule as provided by the Banking Commission shall also constitute grounds to dismiss the appeal. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any party aggrieved by a decision of the Banking Commission shall be entitled to an appeal pursuant to

G.S. 53C-2-6

.

History.

2009-374, s. 2; 2012-56, s. 25.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2012-56, s. 25, effective October 1, 2012, substituted “G.S. 53C-2-6” for “G.S. 53-92(d)” in two places.